Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6907
Equivalent employees, defined.

Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by dividing the total hours paid in a year to employees by the product of forty times the number of weeks in a year. Only the hours paid to employees who are residents of this state shall be included in such computation. A salaried employee who receives a predetermined amount of compensation each pay period on a weekly or less frequent basis is deemed to have been paid for forty hours per week during the pay period.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 7.